Maryland, session 2025, HB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–214.
(A) Each local board shall provide specimen ballots, so labeled, for all ballots to be
used in each election:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1042*

HOUSE BILL 1042
(1) for mailing to registered voters under Title 8 of this article, if mailing
of specimen ballots is chosen or required in the county; and
(2) for other informational purposes in accordance with the provisions of
this article.
(B) EACH SPECIMEN BALLOT SHALL CONSPICUOUSLY DISPLAY THE
PROVISIONS OF § 9–307(C)(2) OF THIS TITLE.
9–307.
(a) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “CANDIDATE’S REPRESENTATIVE” MEANS AN
INDIVIDUAL AUTHORIZED BY, WORKING ON BEHALF OF, OR AFFILIATED WITH A
CANDIDATE, INCLUDING CAMPAIGN STAFF AND VOLUNTEERS.
(B) A qualified applicant may designate a duly authorized agent to pick up and
deliver an absentee ballot under this subtitle.
[(b)] (C) An agent of the voter under this section:
(1) must be at least 18 years old;
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, may
not be a candidate on that ballot OR A CANDIDATE’S REPRESENTATIVE;
(3) shall be designated in a writing signed by the voter under penalty of
perjury; and
(4) shall execute an affidavit under penalty of perjury that the ballot was:
(i) delivered to the voter who submitted the application;
(ii) marked and placed in an envelope by the voter, or with
assistance as allowed by regulation, in the agent’s presence; and
(iii) returned to the local board by the agent.
(D) A FAMILY MEMBER OF A CANDIDATE ON A BALLOT MAY DESIGNATE THE
CANDIDATE OR THE CANDIDATE’S REPRESENTATIVE AS A DULY AUTHORIZED AGENT
TO PICK UP AND DELIVER THE FAMILY MEMBER’S ABSENTEE BALLOT.
9–312.
Any person who is convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this subtitle is
subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 or imprisonment for not more than 2 years or both.

HOUSE BILL 1042 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before January 1, 2026,
the State Board of Elections shall adopt regulations to carry out this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.